Utah statutes.
58-41-5.   Licensure requirements.
To obtain and maintain a license as a speech-language pathologist or
audiologist, the applicant must:
(1)  submit a completed application in the form and content prescribed by the
division and pay a fee to the department in accordance with Section 63J-1-504;
(2)  be of good moral character;
(3)  provide the committee with verification:
(a)  from the educational institutions involved, that the applicant is the
legal holder of a doctor's or master's degree or its equivalent in the area of
speech-language pathology, speech science, or audiology, from an accredited
university or college, based on a program of studies primarily in the field of
speech-language pathology, speech sciences, or audiology; and
(b)  that the applicant has had training and experience in treating and
managing the major communication disabilities identified in speech-language
pathology or audiology;
(4)  be in compliance with the regulations of conduct and codes of ethics for
the profession of speech-language pathology and audiology;
(5)  submit to the board certified evidence of having completed at least one
year of professional experience (at least 30 hours per week for an academic
year) of direct clinical experience in treatment and management of patients.
That treatment and management shall be supervised and attested by one holding
a license under this chapter, the CCC, or their full equivalent;
(6)  submit transcripts to the board from the educational institutions
involved, indicating a doctor's or master's degree from an accredited program
or satisfactory completion of at least 90 quarter hours in speech or hearing
disorders, of which at least 50 shall be for graduate level credit.  No less
than nine and no more than 12 quarter hours shall be in basic and clinical
audiology for persons applying for the license in speech-language pathology.
No less than nine and no more than 12 quarter hours shall be in basic and
functional speech-language pathology for persons applying for a license in
audiology.  No more than three-quarter hours shall be in thesis or student
research; and
(7)  pass a nationally standardized examination in speech-language pathology
or audiology which is the same as or equivalent to the examination required
for the CCC and with pass-fail criteria equivalent to current ASHA standards.
The board may, in its discretion, require an applicant to pass an acceptable
practical demonstration of clinical skills to an examining committee of
licensed speech-language pathologists appointed by the board.
